Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-906
Surrender of accused by surety to sheriff; authority.

In all cases of bail for the appearance of any person or persons charged with any criminal offense, the surety or sureties of such person or persons may, at any time before judgment is rendered against him or them, seize and surrender such person or persons charged as aforesaid to the sheriff of the county wherein the recognizance shall be taken.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 351, p. 803;

R.S.1913, § 9008;

C.S.1922, § 10032;

C.S.1929, § 29-906;

R.S.1943, § 29-906.

Section applies to giving bond for personal appearance of defendant prior to the trial and not after. State v. Swedland, 114 Neb. 280, 207 N.W. 29 (1926).